New York, session 2025-2026, S9615.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "Anthony Amoros Law". 3 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 23 of the general business law is 4 amended by adding a new paragraph f to read as follows: 5 f. (1) No motor vehicle, which has been manufactured on or after 6 September first, nineteen hundred ninety-seven, shall be sold by an 7 automobile auctioneer, retail dealer or individual seller unless they 8 have disclosed to the buyer whether the vehicle is missing an inflatable 9 restraint system or contains a non-functioning inflatable restraint 10 system. If the vehicle is missing an inflatable restraint system or 11 contains a non-functioning inflatable restraint system the disclosure of 12 the status of the vehicle's inflatable restraint system shall be made by 13 the auctioneer, retail dealer or individual seller: (i) in a written 14 disclosure made in not less than ten-point bold face type and appearing 15 on the front of the sales contract, receipt, invoice, or other document 16 used in connection with the sale of the vehicle that shall set forth 17 whether the vehicle is missing an inflatable restraint system or 18 contains a non-functioning inflatable restraint system; and (ii) by 19 affixing a conspicuous sign to the windshield of each vehicle offered 20 for sale, sold or made available for inspection prior to auction that 21 shall disclose that the vehicle either is missing an inflatable 22 restraint system or contains a non-functioning inflatable restraint 23 system. 24 (2) Receipt of notice pursuant to this paragraph shall not in any way 25 bar, preclude or foreclose any action for personal injury or wrongful 26 death by or on behalf of any person, nor in any way diminish, reduce or 27 be used to mitigate or diminish the damages recoverable in any such EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15323-01-6 S. 9615 2 1 action, nor shall receipt of notice be used as evidence of culpable 2 conduct in any action for personal injury or wrongful death. 3 (3) The automobile auctioneer, retail dealer or individual seller 4 shall, by electronic means or in person, forward or present to the 5 department of motor vehicles that such disclosure of the airbag 6 restraint system and compliance was acknowledged by both parties. If the 7 disclosure is not fulfilled, then the vehicle offered for sale may not 8 be sold or transferred. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.